apertium-lit.lit.dix
    <pardef n="raid/ė__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ei</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ę</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėje</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ė</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žių</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėms</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėse</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėmis</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="up/ė__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ei</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ę</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėje</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ė</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ių</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėms</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>es</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėse</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ėmis</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ės</l><r>ė<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="kazino__n_m">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="įvai/zdis__n_m">
      <e><p><l>džio</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džiui</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zdį</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zdyje</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zdi</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džiu</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>zdis</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džių</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džiams</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džius</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džiuose</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džiai</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džiais</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>džiai</l><r>zdis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="tė/tis__n_m">
      <e><p><l>čio</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiui</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tį</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tyje</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ti</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiu</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tis</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čių</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiams</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čius</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiuose</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiai</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiais</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>čiai</l><r>tis<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="deguon/is__n_m">
      <e><p><l>ies</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iui</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imi</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     
    <pardef n="šird/is__n_f">
      <e><p><l>ies</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>žiai</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>į</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yje</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imi</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ži</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ims</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>is</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>yse</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>imis</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ys</l><r>is<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
     

    <e lm="širdis"><i>šird</i><par n="šird/is__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="reikšmė"><i>reikšm</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="duoklė"><i>duokl</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="visuomenė"><i>visuomen</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nuosavybė"><i>nuosavyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sąmonė"><i>sąmon</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="saulė"><i>saul</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lentelė"><i>lentel</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="katė"><i>kat</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tūkstantmetis"><i>tūkstantme</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="laisvė"><i>laisv</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="amerikietis"><i>amerikie</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="prekė"><i>prek</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vaistinė"><i>vaistin</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gerklė"><i>gerkl</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sekretorė"><i>sekretor</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="atsakomybė"><i>atsakomyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="paukštis"><i>paukš</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tikimybė"><i>tikimyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kelionė"><i>kelion</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vyriausybė"><i>vyriausyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gervė"><i>gerv</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pramonė"><i>pramon</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="svetainė"><i>svetain</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dėžė"><i>dėž</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="prezidentė"><i>prezident</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bendruomenė"><i>bendruomen</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pelė"><i>pel</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bazė"><i>baz</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kokybė"><i>kokyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="valstybė"><i>valstyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="žvaigždė"><i>žvaigžd</i><par n="raid/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="teisė"><i>teis</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="žolė"><i>žol</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lapkritis"><i>lapkri</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="galimybė"><i>galimyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="paskirtis"><i>paskir</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="deguonis"><i>deguon</i><par n="deguon/is__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="grupė"><i>grup</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="aplinkybė"><i>aplinkyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="įvaizdis"><i>įvai</i><par n="įvai/zdis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="pavardė"><i>pavard</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="taisyklė"><i>taisykl</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="įmonė"><i>įmon</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vokietis"><i>vokie</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="rugpjtis"><i>rugpj</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="eglė"><i>egl</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="europietis"><i>europie</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="aibė"><i>aib</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="raidė"><i>raid</i><par n="raid/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gėlė"><i>gėl</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="eilė"><i>eil</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="tėtis"><i>tė</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="baimė"><i>baim</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karalienė"><i>karalien</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sintaksė"><i>sintaks</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="gyvybė"><i>gyvyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="skystis"><i>skys</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="arg"><i>arg</i><par n="kazino__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="meniu"><i>meniu</i><par n="kazino__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kazino"><i>kazino</i><par n="kazino__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="kakadu"><i>kakadu</i><par n="kazino__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="tėvynė"><i>tėvyn</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="žemė"><i>žem</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="krikščionybė"><i>krikščionyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="karvė"><i>karv</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nepriklausomybė"><i>nepriklausomyb</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="amplitudė"><i>amplitud</i><par n="raid/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="nuomonė"><i>nuomon</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dienoraštis"><i>dienoraš</i><par n="tė/tis__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="analizė"><i>analiz</i><par n="up/ė__n_f"/></e>
